Hawaii statutes.
[§206E-4.5] Urban gardening programs.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the authority may develop programs
that provide incentives for the development of housing projects that
incorporate urban gardening programs; provided that the college of tropical
agriculture and human resources of the University of Hawaii at Manoa shall be
consulted regarding best practices in urban gardening, including vertical
gardening, aquaponics, and community gardening. [L 2013, c 202, §3]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next